Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 5

Solicitation of Charitable Funds

48-101-501. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Charitable organization” means a group which is or holds itself out to be a benevolent, educational, voluntary health, philanthropic, humane, patriotic, religious or eleemosynary organization, or for the benefit of law enforcement personnel, firefighters, or other persons who protect the public safety, or any person who solicits or obtains contributions solicited from the public for charitable purposes. A chapter, branch, area, office or similar affiliate or any person soliciting contributions within the state for a charitable organization which has its principal place of business outside the state shall be a charitable organization for the purposes of this part. “Charitable organization” does not include any authorized individual who solicits, by authority of the organization, solely on behalf of a registered or exempt organization, or on behalf of an organization excluded from the definition of charitable organization;

“Commercial co-venturer” means any person who:

Is organized for profit;

Is regularly and primarily engaged in trade or commerce, other than in connection with soliciting for charitable or civic organizations or charitable purposes; and

Conducts an advertised charitable sales promotion for a specified limited period of time;

“Contributions” means the promise or grant of any money or property of any kind or value, including the payment or promise to pay in consideration of a sale, performance or show of any kind which is advertised or offered in conjunction with the name of any charity. “Contribution” does not include bona fide fees, dues or assessments paid by members; provided, that membership is not conferred solely as consideration for making a contribution in response to a solicitation;

“Disaster” means any natural, technological, or civil emergency that causes damage of sufficient severity and magnitude to result in a declaration of a state of emergency by a county, the governor, or the president of the United States;

“Federated fund raising organization” means a federation of independent charitable organizations which have voluntarily joined together, including, but not limited to, a united fund or community chest, for purposes of raising and distributing money for and among themselves, and where membership does not confer operating authority and control of the individual agencies upon the federated group organization;

“Knowingly” or “knowing” means actual awareness of the falsity or deception, but actual awareness may be inferred when objective manifestations indicate that a reasonable person would have known or would have reason to know of the falsity or deception;

“Person” means any individual, organization, trust, foundation, group, association, partnership, corporation, society or any combination of them;

“Professional solicitor” means any person who, for a financial or other consideration, solicits contributions for, or on behalf of, a charitable organization, whether such solicitation is performed personally or through such person's agents, servants or employees or through agents, servants or employees specially employed by or for a charitable organization, who are engaged in the solicitation of contributions under the direction of such person, or a person who plans, conducts, manages, carries on or advises a charitable organization in connection with the solicitation of contributions. Any independent marketing agent or entity to whom a professional solicitor assigns fund raising or solicitation responsibilities shall be deemed to be a professional solicitor for purposes of this part. A salaried officer or permanent employee of a charitable organization is not deemed to be a professional solicitor. However, any salaried officer or employee of a charitable organization that engages in the solicitation of contributions for compensation in any manner for more than one (1) charitable organization is deemed a professional solicitor. A professional solicitor does not include an attorney, investment counselor, or banker who in the conduct of such person's profession advises a client;

“Secretary of state” means the secretary of state or the secretary of state's authorized representative;

“Solicit” or “solicitation” means any oral or written request, however communicated, whether directly or indirectly, for a contribution; and

“Solicitee” or “donor” means any person from whom a charitable contribution or donation is solicited, directly or indirectly, by whatever means by any professional solicitor, a charitable organization or other person, whether any contribution is received in response to the solicitation.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 1; T.C.A., § 48-2201; Acts 1989, ch. 285, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 901, § 1; 1991, ch. 299, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 252, § 12; 1994, ch. 667, §§ 1-5; T.C.A., § 48-3-501; Acts 1995, ch. 158, § 2; 1996, ch. 907, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 523, §§ 1-5; 2011, ch. 232, § 1; 2017, ch. 146, § 1.

Cross-References. Nonprofit corporations, title 48, chs. 51-68.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Charities, § 3, 20.

Attorney General Opinions. Trusts and life insurance agents involved in a LILAC transaction, a trust arrangement formed to pay the proceeds of life annuity contracts and life insurance policies to investors and charities, are not required to register under the Solicitation of Charitable Funds Act, OAG 04-168, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 180 (11/23/04).

“Charitable purposes” and “noncharitable purposes” are not defined in the Charitable Solicitations Act. However, given the context in which those terms are used, “charitable purposes” would include activities in substantial furtherance of the benevolent, educational, voluntary health, philanthropic, humane, patriotic, religious, and eleemosynary work of a charitable organization. Whether lobbying at any governmental level or in any particular “amount” constitutes a “charitable purpose” or a “noncharitable purpose” within the meaning of the Act will depend on the particular facts and circumstances involved in any given instance. An “action organization” may or may not be a charitable organization, depending on the particular facts and circumstances in any given instance. Attempting to influence legislation and advocating or campaigning for objectives that may only be attained via the legislative process may or may not constitute a charitable purpose depending on the particular facts and circumstances involved in any given instance. Participating or intervening in any political campaign in support of or in opposition to any candidate for public office does not constitute a charitable purpose. OAG 16-41, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (12/6/2016).

48-101-502. Exemptions.

The registration requirements of this part do not apply to:

Bona fide religious institutions, educational institutions, or cooperative scholarship corporations regulated by title 49, chapter 4, part 1;

A charitable organization that does not raise or receive gross contributions (total solicited revenue before any solicitation expenses have been deducted) from the public in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) during a fiscal year; provided, that if the contributions raised from the public by any charitable organization during any fiscal year exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the charitable organization, within thirty (30) days after the date it receives total contributions exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), shall register with, and report to, the secretary of state as required by this part;

Volunteer fire departments, rescue squads or local civil defense organizations;

Community fairs, county fairs, district fairs and division fairs, as defined in § 43-21-104, that have been qualified by the commissioner of agriculture to receive state aid grants, pursuant to title 43, chapter 21, part 1;

Political parties, candidates for federal or state office, and political action committees required to file financial information with federal or state election commissions;

Hospitals and nursing homes that are subject to regulation by the Tennessee department of health; and

Any corporation established by an act of congress of the United States that is required by federal law to submit annual reports of its activities to congress containing itemized accounts of all receipts and expenditures after being fully audited by the department of defense.

“Educational institution”, for the purposes of this section, means an organization organized and operated exclusively for educational purposes and which normally maintains a regular faculty and curriculum and normally has a regularly enrolled body of pupils or students in attendance at the place where its educational activities are regularly carried on, and which is accredited by a recognized accrediting agency or has been approved to operate by a local board of education, the achievement school district, or the state board of education. Included in such definition are organizations composed of parents of students and other persons connected with the institution, which are organized and operated for the purpose of conducting activities in support of the operations or extracurricular activities of such institutions. “Educational institution” also includes private foundations soliciting contributions exclusively for such organizations.

“Bona fide religious institutions,” for the purpose of this part, includes:

Ecclesiastical or denominational organizations, churches or established physical places for worship in this state, at which nonprofit religious services and activities are regularly conducted and carried on, and also includes those bona fide religious groups which do not maintain specific places of worship and which are not subject to federal income tax and are not required to file an IRS Form 990 under any circumstance; and

Such separate groups or corporations which form an integral part of those institutions which are exempt from federal income tax as exempt organizations under § 501(c)(3), of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), or of a corresponding section of any subsequently enacted federal revenue act, and which are not required to file an IRS Form 990 under any circumstance, and which are not primarily supported by funds solicited outside their own membership or congregation; and

Such institutions soliciting contributions for the construction and maintenance of a house of worship or residence of a clergy member.

Any charitable organization that claims to be exempt from the registration provisions pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) and that intends to or does solicit charitable contributions shall submit, to the secretary of state, a statement of the name, address and purpose of the organization and a statement setting forth the reason for the claim for exemption. This statement shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and shall be sworn to or affirmed by the principal officer of the charitable organization. No registration fee shall be required of any exempt charitable organization.

Each organization claiming to be exempt pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) shall file annually the form required by this part with the secretary of state within six (6) months of the close of its fiscal year.

Exemption from the registration requirements of this part shall not limit the applicability of other provisions of this part to a charitable organization.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 2; 1983, ch. 363, § 1; 1984, ch. 827, § 1; T.C.A., § 48-2202; Acts 1991, ch. 110, § 1; 1994, ch. 667, §§ 6-11; T.C.A., § 48-3-502; Acts 1996, ch. 907, §§ 4, 5; 2005, ch. 457, § 1; 2007, ch. 523, §§ 6-10; 2009, ch. 253, § 1; 2011, ch. 232, §§ 2, 3; 2014, ch. 630, § 1; 2016, ch. 928, § 1; 2019, ch. 132, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a)(2), substituted “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)” for “thirty thousand dollars ($30,000)” throughout, substituted “A charitable organization that does not raise” for “A charitable organization which does not intend to solicit and receive and does not actually raise” at the beginning, substituted “exceed” for “shall be in excess of”, deleted “shall” preceding “, within thirty (30) days”, substituted “receives” for “shall have received” and substituted “shall register with” for “register with” near the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 132, § 2. July 1, 2019.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Scope of exemption for “bona fide religious institutions,” OAG 97-003, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (1/14/97).

Habitat for Humanity, International is not a bona fide religious institution within the meaning of T.C.A. § 48-101-502(c)(1), OAG 01-018, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 18 (2/6/01).

48-101-503. Secretary of state's duties.

The secretary of state may review registrations and enforce registration requirements for charitable organizations and professional solicitors.

The secretary of state shall prescribe a uniform system of accounting to determine “fund-raising costs” and “gross contributions” and may adopt rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this part. Rules and regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The secretary of state is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations as the secretary of state may deem necessary to effectuate the purposes of Acts 1989, ch. 285. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

The secretary of state shall make such individual investigations of all applicants for registration and of any violations of this part as the secretary of state may deem necessary and impose authorized and appropriate sanctions.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 3; T.C.A., § 48-2203; Acts 1989, ch. 285, §§ 3-5; T.C.A., § 48-3-503; Acts 2007, ch. 523, § 11; 2017, ch. 146, § 2.

48-101-504. Filing of registration statement — Initial registration — Fee.

Every charitable organization that intends to solicit contributions from or within this state, or have funds solicited on its behalf, shall, prior to any solicitation, file a registration statement with the secretary of state, upon forms prescribed by the secretary of state. The secretary of state may prescribe and furnish forms and filing methods for all filings required by this part. Any registration statement that contains false, misleading, deceptive, or incomplete information or documentation is not considered sufficient, except as specifically otherwise provided in this part.

The initial registration statement shall contain the following information:

The name of the organization and the purpose for which it was organized;

The principal address of the organization and the address of any offices in this state. If the organization does not maintain an office, the name and address of the person having custody of its financial records;

The names and addresses of any chapters, branches or affiliates in this state;

The place where, and the date when, the organization was legally established, the form of its organization, and a reference to any determination of its tax exempt status under the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C.);

The names and addresses of the officers, directors, trustees and the principal salaried executive staff officer;

A statement as to whether the organization intends to solicit contributions from the public directly or have such done on its behalf by others and submit a true copy of any contract or agreement with any professional solicitor or any other person who is directly or indirectly involved with the solicitation of contributions;

A statement as to whether the organization is authorized by any other governmental authority to solicit contributions and whether it is or has ever been enjoined by any court from soliciting contributions;

The general purpose or purposes for which the contributions to be solicited shall be used;

The name or names under which it intends to solicit contributions;

The names of the individuals or officers of the organization who will have final responsibility for the custody of the contributions;

The names of the individuals or officers of the organization responsible for the final distribution of the contributions; and

A statement as to whether any officer, director, manager, operator, or principal of the charitable organization has been the subject of an injunction, judgment, or administrative order or has been convicted of a felony.

Except as otherwise herein provided, the registration forms and any other documents prescribed by the secretary of state shall be signed by two (2) authorized officers of the charitable organization, and such forms and documents shall be accompanied by an initial registration fee of fifty dollars ($50.00); provided, that bona fide Indian organizations whose principal purpose is to assist and promote the welfare of Indians shall be exempt from the registration fee. For the purposes of this subsection (b), a bona fide Indian organization shall be one that has been in existence for more than twenty (20) years and that carries out programs and provides services to federally recognized Indians.

During its first year of operation, a newly registered charitable organization shall provide quarterly financial reports, due within thirty (30) days after the end of each quarter of its current fiscal year, containing the following information:

The gross amount of contributions received;

The amount of contributions disbursed or to be disbursed to each charitable organization or charitable purpose represented;

The aggregate amounts paid to any professional solicitor; and

The amounts spent for overhead, expenses, commissions and similar purposes.

Every charitable organization required to register pursuant to this part, having completed a fiscal year of operation, shall file with the secretary of state a financial report for its most recently completed fiscal year, in accordance with § 48-101-506(b)(1) and (2).

Any organization which has applied for but not received a determination of tax exempt status shall file a copy of the completed application which has been submitted to the internal revenue service, and any letters received from the internal revenue service acknowledging receipt of the application.

Any senior citizen center that obtains funding for the operation of its programs with funds provided through a contract with the state of Tennessee or through the federal government, as provided by the Older Americans Act of 1965 (42 U.S.C. § 3001 et seq.), or other contracts primarily designed for the benefit of aged persons, is exempt from the annual registration fee of this section, if the center attaches a complete copy of the contract to the registration form, and the secretary of state certifies the contract is valid. For the purposes of this subsection (f), “senior citizen center” means a charitable organization represented and held out to the general public as a facility which contracts for meals, education, physical fitness, social contact and comfort to be provided to aged persons for the general welfare of the local community.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 4; T.C.A., § 48-2204; Acts 1989, ch. 285, §§ 6-8; 1991, ch. 299, § 3; 1993, ch. 252, § 1; 1994, ch. 667, §§ 12-16; T.C.A., § 48-3-504; Acts 1996, ch. 575, § 1; 1996, ch. 907, § 6; 2007, ch. 474, § 1; 2007, ch. 523, § 12; 2017, ch. 146, §§ 3, 4; 2020, ch. 719, §§ 12, 13.

Compiler's Notes. Section 48-101-506(b)(3), referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 523, § 15, effective July 1, 2007.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment in (a)(1), substituted “that intends” for “which intends” near the beginning, added the second sentence, and, in the third sentence, substituted “that contains” for “which contains” and substituted “is not considered” for “shall not be considered” near the middle; and deleted “or (b)(3)” following “§ 48-101-506(b)(1) and (2)” in (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35. June 22, 2020.

48-101-505. Affiliates of parent organization — Filing registration statement — Fee.

Each chapter, branch or affiliate of a parent organization or independent member agency of a federated fund-raising organization, may separately report the information required by § 48-101-504, or report the information to its parent organization or to the federated fund-raising organization with which it is affiliated, which shall then transmit such information as to its affiliates, branches, chapters or independent agency members to the secretary of state along with its own statement.

A parent organization filing the registration statements of one (1) or more of its chapters, branches, or affiliates along with its own statement, and a federated fund-raising organization filing the statements of one (1) or more of its independent member agencies along with its own statement, shall pay a single registration fee in accordance with the schedule as provided in § 48-101-504(b) for itself and for such chapters, branches, affiliates or independent member agencies whose statements are filed by it at the same time as its own statement. However, when an independent member agency of a federated fund-raising organization solicits or receives contributions from any source other than the federated fund-raising organization or a governmental agency, such independent member agency shall be required to register independently and pay its own filing fee, unless otherwise exempt by this part. When a chapter, branch, or affiliate of a parent organization solicits or receives contributions from any source other than the parent organization or a governmental agency, such chapter, branch, or affiliate shall register independently and pay its own filing fee, unless otherwise exempt by this part.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 5; T.C.A., § 48-2205; Acts 1989, ch. 285, § 9; 1993, ch. 252, § 13; T.C.A., § 48-3-505.

48-101-506. Issuance of registration — Renewal — Withdrawal of registration.

The secretary of state shall examine each application for conformity with the requirements of this part and all relevant rules and regulations.

A renewal of registration shall be made in the same manner as the initial registration. The renewal registration shall be accompanied by the following:

A copy of a financial statement on forms approved by the secretary of state. Such report shall also specifically identify the amount of funds raised and all costs and expenses incidental thereto, all publicity costs, and costs of allocation or disbursement of funds raised. This report shall be signed by at least two (2) authorized officers of the organization, one of whom shall be the chief fiscal officer. Such officers shall certify that such report is true and correct to the best of their knowledge; and

The secretary of state may require, by regulation, a copy of any and all forms required to be filed by the organization with the United States internal revenue service, and any other information the secretary deems appropriate to substantiate how funds were raised and spent by the organization;

The annual report of every charitable organization which received in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in gross revenue during the most recently completed fiscal year shall be accompanied by:

An audited financial statement, presented in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles which has been examined by an independent certified public accountant for the purpose of expressing an opinion thereon; and

Any and all forms required to be filed by a charitable organization with the United States internal revenue service;

For the purpose of determining gross revenue for this subdivision (b)(2) only, grants received from government agencies and private foundations, designated by the internal revenue service as § 501(c)(3) organizations (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), shall be excluded.

The registration renewal statement shall be signed by two (2) authorized officers of the charitable organization, one (1) of whom shall be the chief fiscal officer, and such forms and documents shall be accompanied by a registration renewal fee in accordance with the following schedule:

Organization's Gross Revenue Annual Filing Fee $0--$50,000.00 $ 80.00 $50,000.01--$99,999.99 $ 120.00 $100,000.00--$249,999.99 $ 160.00 $250,000.00--$499,999.99 $ 200.00 $500,000.00--ABOVE $ 240.00

Click to view table.

For purposes of this subsection (c), “organization's gross revenue” means the latest figures for annual gross revenue from whatever source reported by the organization to the secretary of state pursuant to subsection (b).

Each charitable organization shall file all information required by this part with the secretary of state within six (6) months of the close of its fiscal year. The last day of the sixth month following the month in which the fiscal year of the organization ends shall be the anniversary date of the organization. All registrations shall expire each year on the anniversary date of the organization. Each annual registration application shall be received by the secretary of state on or before the anniversary date. Each charitable organization shall be required to supplement its registration application during the registration period as changes occur which affect the documentation required by § 48-101-504(a).

The secretary of state may extend the time for filing a renewal application for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days, during which time the previous registration remains in effect. If an organization has been permitted additional time to file an exempt organization return with the internal revenue service, upon submission of proof of such extension, the secretary may extend the time for filing a renewal application for an additional period not to exceed sixty (60) days, during which time the previous registration remains in effect.

Applications received after the expiration of the current registration period shall be assessed a late fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each month, or portion thereof, that the report is late filed. The late filing fee shall accompany every late filed application. In addition to the late fee provided for herein, any organization which files a late application is also subject to the imposition of civil penalties for violation of any portion of this part.

Any person that intends to continue to solicit contributions after its anniversary date and fails to renew its registration by the time of the expiration thereof is in violation of this part.

Any person that ceases solicitation activities after registration must notify the secretary of state of such fact within thirty (30) days after solicitation activities end. Within ninety (90) days after the end of the solicitation activities or ninety (90) days after its fiscal year ends, that person shall file with the secretary financial documentation, pursuant to subsection (b).

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 4; T.C.A., § 48-2204; Acts 1989, ch. 285, §§ 10, 11; 1993, ch. 252, § 14; 1994, ch. 667, §§ 17, 18; T.C.A., § 48-3-506; Acts 1996, ch. 907, § 7; 1997, ch. 227, §§ 1-3; 2001, ch. 97, § 1; 2007, ch. 523, §§ 13-16, 37; 2014, ch. 630, § 2; 2016, ch. 928, § 2; 2020, ch. 586, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “$50,000.00” for “$48,999.99” and “$50,000.01” for “$49,000.00” in (c)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 586, § 2. March 20, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 89-35, 1989 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (3/20/89).

48-101-507. Professional solicitor — Registration — Qualifications
— Bond — Fee — Reports.

No person shall act as a professional solicitor for any charitable organization, whether exempt from this part or not, unless such person has first registered with the secretary of state. Registration shall include the filing of a complete application, bond and filing fee.

No person who has been convicted within the past five (5) years for a violation of any provision of this part, and no person convicted of a felony in this or any other state, shall serve as an employee, member, officer or agent of any professional solicitor until such person's civil rights have been restored. The professional solicitor shall maintain during each solicitation campaign and for three (3) years after its completion the name and address of each employee, agent, or other person involved in the solicitation campaign.

Application for registration shall be in writing in the form prescribed by the secretary of state and contain such information as the secretary of state may require. A registration application that contains false, misleading, deceptive or incomplete information or document shall not be considered sufficient or complete. All registrations for professional solicitors shall expire on December 31 of the year for which they are issued.

Applications received after December 31 shall be assessed a late fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each month, or portion thereof, that the report is late filed. The late filing fee shall accompany every late-filed application. In addition to the late fee provided for herein, any organization which files a late application is also subject to the imposition of civil penalties for violation of any portion of this section.

A bond in the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be filed with the registration application and shall be approved by the secretary of state. The bond shall name the applicant as the principal obligor with one (1) or more sureties, satisfactory to the secretary of state, whose liability in the aggregate as such sureties will at least equal that sum. It shall be payable to the State of Tennessee for the use of the secretary of state and any person who may have a cause of action against the obligor of the bond for any violations under this part or for any losses resulting from malfeasance, nonfeasance or misfeasance in the conduct of solicitation activities. An individual, partnership or corporation, which is a professional solicitor, may file a consolidated bond on behalf of all its members, officers and employees. The bond shall continue in effect so long as a registration is in effect.

The annual registration fee for every person who is a professional solicitor shall be two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

A professional solicitor shall file a financial report for a solicitation campaign with the secretary of state within ninety (90) days after a solicitation campaign has been completed or within ninety (90) days after the end of the fiscal year end of any campaign which lasts for more than one (1) year. The financial report shall include gross revenue and an itemization of all expenditures from those funds. The report shall be completed on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and signed by an authorized official of the professional solicitor and two (2) authorized officials of the charitable organization, who shall certify that such report is true and complete to the best of their knowledge. The financial report shall be audited by an independent certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards or regulations which may be issued by the secretary of state. If the solicitation campaign which is conducted by a professional solicitor is one conducted nationally or regionally and is not confined only to this state, the financial information required to be filed pursuant to this subsection (b) shall be inclusive of the national or regional campaign. Each charitable organization shall make available to its professional solicitor any necessary fiscal or other records needed to enable the professional solicitor to comply with this subsection (b).

Financial reports for solicitation campaigns shall be assessed a late fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each month, or portion thereof, that the report is late filed. The late filing fee shall accompany every late-filed campaign report. In addition to the late fee provided for herein, any person who files a late financial report is also subject to the imposition of civil penalties for violation of any portion of this section.

A professional solicitor who, by contractual agreement with a charitable organization, does not receive donations on behalf of a charitable organization, does not have access to the funds raised and does not make deposits to and does not have signature authority with, or any other authority over, a charitable organization's bank accounts, shall not be required to file an audited financial statement as set forth in subdivision (b)(1). In lieu of the audited financial statement, the professional solicitor shall be required to file with the secretary of state, on a form approved by the secretary of state, a financial report which provides an itemization of expenses, costs, reimbursements and fees the charitable organization is charged for each solicitation campaign performed. The form shall be due within ninety (90) days after the completion of any campaign or within ninety (90) days after the end of the fiscal year of any campaign which lasts longer than one (1) year. The report shall be signed by an authorized official of the professional solicitor and two (2) authorized officials of the charitable organization, who shall certify under oath that such report is true and complete to the best of their knowledge.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 7; T.C.A., § 48-2207; Acts 1989, ch. 285, §§ 12-17; 1991, ch. 299, §§ 4-7; 1993, ch. 252, §§ 2, 3; 1994, ch. 667, §§ 19-24; T.C.A., § 48-3-507; Acts 1997, ch. 227, §§ 4-11; 2001, ch. 97, §§ 2-4; 2007, ch. 523, §§ 17-23, 38; 2014, ch. 630, §§ 3, 4; 2017, ch. 146, §§ 5, 6.

Cross-References. Restoration of citizenship, title 40, ch. 29.

48-101-508. Denial of exemption or registration — Hearing — Review.

The division shall examine each registration statement and supporting documents filed by all applicants and shall determine whether the registration requirements are satisfied. If the division determines that the registration requirements are not satisfied, the department shall notify the applicant within ten (10) working days of its receipt of its registration statement or the registration statement is deemed to be approved. Within seven (7) days after receipt of notification that the regulation requirements are not satisfied, the applicant may request a hearing. The hearing shall be held within seven (7) days of receipt of the request, and a determination shall be rendered within three (3) business days of the hearing.

Judicial review of final decisions shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 8; 1977, ch. 95, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 48-2208, 48-3-508; Acts 1996, ch. 907, § 8; 2007, ch. 523, § 24.

48-101-509. Fiscal records — Charitable campaign records — Inspection.

Every charitable organization and professional solicitor, subject to this part, shall, as to their activities in Tennessee as may be covered by this part and in accordance with the rules and regulations prescribed by the secretary of state, keep:

True and accurate fiscal records, including, but not limited to, all income and expenses; and

True records regarding the conduct of any solicitation campaigns, including records of any documents, information, notices or applications required to be prepared or filed pursuant to § 48-101-513. Unless otherwise provided, such records shall be retained for a period of at least three (3) years after the end of the period of registration to which they relate.

Upon request and at a reasonable time and place within Tennessee, such records, as well as any other records regarding solicitation campaigns within this state, shall be made available to the secretary of state, the attorney general and reporter or an appropriate district attorney general for inspection.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 9; T.C.A., § 48-2209; Acts 1989, ch. 285, §§ 18, 19; 1991, ch. 299, § 8; 1993, ch. 252, § 4; T.C.A., § 48-3-509.

48-101-510. Reciprocity.

The secretary of state may enter into reciprocal agreements with the appropriate authority of any other state for the purpose of exchanging information with respect to charitable organizations. Pursuant to such agreements, the secretary of state may accept information filed by a charitable organization with the appropriate authority of another state, in lieu of the information required to be filed in accordance with this part, if such information is substantially similar to the information required under this part.

The secretary of state shall also grant an exemption from the requirement for the filing of the annual registration statement to charitable organizations organized under the laws of another state, having their principal place of business outside the state, whose funds are derived principally from sources outside the state, and which have been granted exemption from the filing of registration statements by the state under whose laws they are organized, if such state has a statute similar in substance to this part.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 10; T.C.A., §§ 48-2210, 48-3-510.

Attorney General Opinions. The Georgia solicitations statute is similar in substance to the Tennessee solicitations statute so that the Georgia solicitations statute can be used as a basis for making a determination that Habitat for Humanity, International is exempt from registration under the reciprocity provisions of the Solicitations of Charitable Funds Act, OAG 01-018, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 18 (2/6/01).

48-101-511. Documents and records as public records — Inspection.

Registration statements and applications, reports, and all other documents and information required to be filed under this part or by the secretary of state shall be public records in the office of the secretary of state and shall be open to the general public for inspection at such time and under such conditions as the secretary of state may prescribe. The secretary of state, in the secretary of state's discretion, may compile, summarize, publish or otherwise release to the public any information contained in applications and any other documents filed with or received by the secretary of state under this part.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 11; T.C.A., § 48-2211; Acts 1989, ch. 285, § 20; T.C.A., § 48-3-511.

48-101-512. Identification of solicitor.

It is the duty of every charitable organization to furnish identification to persons who solicit contributions from the public on behalf of the charitable organization, including, but not limited to, those persons soliciting on behalf of an exempt organization or nonexempt organization and all professional solicitors. The solicitor shall be required to have and produce or display, on demand, identification indicating that the solicitor has been duly authorized by the organization for which the solicitor is soliciting. Such identification shall include, but not be limited to, the name of the holder of the identification and the name and the registration number of the charitable organization.

Acts 1976, ch. 735, § 12; T.C.A., § 48-2212; Acts 1989, ch. 285, §§ 21, 22; T.C.A., § 48-3-512.